Hawaii, session 2025, HB895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the appropriations provided in this Act constitute the State's share of the cost to provide the services required pursuant to this Act and declares that the appropriations are in accordance with Article VIII, section 5 of the Hawaii State Constitution. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) positions within the Honolulu police department to enforce applicable fireworks laws; provided that the department shall employ effective means of enforcement, including, when appropriate: (1)  The use of unmarked vehicles and civilian clothing by officers as they patrol neighborhoods; and (2)  The immediate issuance of citations. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Honolulu police department for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) positions within the Hawaii police department to enforce applicable fireworks laws; provided that the department shall employ effective means of enforcement, including, when appropriate: (1)  The use of unmarked vehicles and civilian clothing by officers as they patrol neighborhoods; and (2)  The immediate issuance of citations. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii police department for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) positions within the Maui police department to enforce applicable fireworks laws; provided that the department shall employ effective means of enforcement, including, when appropriate: (1)  The use of unmarked vehicles and civilian clothing by officers as they patrol neighborhoods; and (2)  The immediate issuance of citations. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Maui police department for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $          or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for four full-time equivalent (4.0 FTE) positions within the Kauai police department to enforce applicable fireworks laws; provided that the department shall employ effective means of enforcement, including, when appropriate: (1)  The use of unmarked vehicles and civilian clothing by officers as they patrol neighborhoods; and (2)  The immediate issuance of citations. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Kauai police department for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________